Ohio, session 136, HB110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 2907.08 of the Revised Code be 3
amended to read as follows: 4
Sec. 2907.08. (A) No person, for the purpose of sexually 5
arousing or gratifying the person's self, shall commit trespass 6
or otherwise surreptitiously invade the privacy of another, to 7
spy or eavesdrop upon another. 8
(B) No person shall knowingly commit trespass or otherwise 9
secretly or surreptitiously videotape, film, photograph, 10
broadcast, stream, or otherwise record another person, in a 11
place where a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy, 12
for the purpose of viewing the private areas of that person. 13
(C) No person shall knowingly commit trespass or otherwise 14
secretly or surreptitiously videotape, film, photograph, 15
broadcast, stream, or otherwise record a minor, in a place where 16
a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy, for the 17

H. B. No. 110 Page 2
As Introduced
purpose of viewing the private areas of the minor. 18
(D) No person shall secretly or surreptitiously videotape, 19
film, photograph, or otherwise record another person above, 20
under, or through the clothing being worn by that other person 21
for the purpose of viewing the body of, or the undergarments 22
worn by, that other person. 23
(E)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of 24
voyeurism. 25
(2) AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a 26
violation of division (A) of this section is a misdemeanor of 27
the third degree. If the offender previously has been convicted 28
of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of division (A) 29
of this section, a violation of division (A) of this section is 30
a felony of the third degree. 31
(3) AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a 32
violation of division (B) of this section is a misdemeanor of 33
the second degree. If the offender previously has been convicted 34
of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of division (B) 35
of this section, a violation of division (B) of this section is 36
a felony of the third degree. 37
(4) AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a 38
violation of division (D) of this section is a misdemeanor of 39
the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted 40
of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of division (D) 41
of this section, a violation of division (D) of this section is 42
a felony of the third degree. 43
(5) AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a 44
violation of division (C) of this section is a felony of the 45
fifth degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of 46

H. B. No. 110 Page 3
As Introduced
or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of division (C) of 47
this section, a violation of division (C) of this section is a 48
felony of the third degree. 49
Section 2. That existing section 2907.08 of the Revised 50
Code is hereby repealed. 51